Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1722
Mobile massage therapy establishment license revoked or expired; not reinstated.

The license of a mobile massage therapy establishment that has been revoked or expired for any reason shall not be reinstated. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such establishment may reopen for business.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 11.